lex1.lexc
LEXICON irreg-tabhair
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:tugaim				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:tugann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:tugann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:tugaimid				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:tugann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:tugann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:tugtar				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:thug					#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:thug					#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:thug					#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:thugamar				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:thug					#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:thug					#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:thugadh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:tabharfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:tabharfaidh			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:tabharfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:tabharfaimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:tabharfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:tabharfaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:tabharfar				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:thabharfainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:thabharfá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:thabharfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:thabharfaimis			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:thabharfadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:thabharfaidís			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:thabharfaí				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:thugainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:thugtá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:thugadh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:thugaimis			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:thugadh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:thugaidís			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:thugtaí				#;

LEXICON irreg-tar
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:tagaim				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:tagann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:tagann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:tagaimid				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:tagann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:tagann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:tagtar				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:tháinig				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:tháinig				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:tháinig				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:thángamar				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:tháinig				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:tháinig				#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:thángthas				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:tiocfaidh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:tiocfaidh				#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:tiocfaidh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:tiocfaimid				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:tiocfaidh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:tiocfaidh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:tiocfar				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:thiocfainn				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:thiocfá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:thiocfadh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:thiocfaimis			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:thiocfadh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:thiocfaidís			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:thiocfaí				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:thagainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:thagtá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:thagadh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:thagaimis			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:thagadh				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:thagaidís			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:thagtaí				#;

LEXICON irreg-téigh
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PSg:téim				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PSg:téann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PSg:téann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+1PPl:téimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+2PPl:téann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+3PPl:téann				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Pres+Auto:téitear			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PSg:chuaigh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PSg:chuaigh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PSg:chuaigh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+1PPl:chuamar			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+2PPl:chuaigh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+3PPl:chuaigh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Past+Auto:chuathas			#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PSg:rachaidh			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PSg:rachaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PSg:rachaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+1PPl:rachaimid			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+2PPl:rachaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+3PPl:rachaidh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Fut+Auto:rachfar			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PSg:rachainn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PSg:rachfá				#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PSg:rachadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+1PPl:rachaimis			#;		
+Verb+Irreg+Con+2PPl:rachadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+3PPl:rachaidís			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Con+Auto:rachfaí			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PSg:théinn			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PSg:théiteá			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PSg:théadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+1PPl:théimis			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+2PPl:théadh			#;
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+3PPl:théidís			#;	
+Verb+Irreg+Imperf+Auto:théistí			#;

LEXICON Verbs
irreg-tabhair;			! to give
irreg-tar;				! to come
irreg-téigh;			! to go
